Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
SUBPART 3
EQUITY PURCHASERS

6-1-1111. Written contract required.

Every contract shall be written in at least nine-point, legible type and fully completed, signed, and dated by the home owner and equity purchaser prior to the execution of any instrument quit-claiming, assigning, transferring, conveying, or encumbering an interest in the residence in foreclosure.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1338, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1133), ch. 350, p. 1616, § 4, effective January 1, 2011.

6-1-1112. Written contract - contents - notice.

Every contract shall contain the entire agreement of the parties and shall include the following terms:

The name, business address, and telephone number of the equity purchaser;

The street address and full legal description of the residence in foreclosure;

Clear and conspicuous disclosure of any financial or legal obligations of the home owner that will be assumed by the equity purchaser. If the equity purchaser will not be assuming any financial or legal obligations of the home owner, the equity purchaser shall provide to the home owner a separate written disclosure that substantially complies with section 18-5-802 (6), C.R.S.

The total consideration to be paid by the equity purchaser in connection with or incident to the acquisition by the equity purchaser of the residence in foreclosure;

The terms of payment or other consideration, including, but not limited to, any services of any nature that the equity purchaser represents will be performed for the home owner before or after the sale;

The date and time when possession of the residence in foreclosure is to be transferred to the equity purchaser;

The terms of any rental agreement or lease;

The specifications of any option or right to repurchase the residence in foreclosure, including the specific amounts of any escrow deposit, down payment, purchase price, closing costs, commissions, or other fees or costs;

A notice of cancellation as provided in section 6-1-1114; and

The following notice, in at least nine-point bold-faced type, and completed with the name of the equity purchaser, immediately above the statement required by section 6-1-1114:

The contract required by this section survives delivery of any instrument of conveyance of the residence in foreclosure, but does not have any effect on persons other than the parties to the contract or affect title to the residence in foreclosure.

NOTICE REQUIRED BY COLORADO LAW

Until your right to cancel this contract has ended, (Name) or anyone working for

(Name) CANNOT ask you to sign or have you sign any deed or any other document.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1339, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

IP(1)(j) amended, (HB 10-1133), ch. 350, p. 1617, § 5, effective January 1, 2011.

6-1-1113. Cancellation.

In addition to any right of rescission available under state or federal law, the home owner has the right to cancel a contract with an equity purchaser until 12 midnight of the third business day following the day on which the home owner signs a contract that complies with this part 11 or until 12 noon on the day before the foreclosure sale of the residence in foreclosure, whichever occurs first.

Cancellation occurs when the home owner personally delivers written notice of cancellation to the address specified in the contract or upon deposit of such notice in the United States mail, properly addressed, with postage prepaid.

A notice of cancellation given by the home owner need not take the particular form as provided with the contract and, however expressed, is effective if it indicates the intention of the home owner not to be bound by the contract.

In the absence of any written notice of cancellation from the home owner, the execution by the home owner of a deed or other instrument of conveyance of an interest in the residence in foreclosure to the equity purchaser after the expiration of the rescission period creates a rebuttable presumption that the home owner did not cancel the contract with the equity purchaser.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1340, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1114. Notice of cancellation.

The contract shall contain, as the last provision before the space reserved for the home owner's signature, a conspicuous statement in at least twelve-point bold-faced type, as follows:

The equity purchaser shall accurately specify the date and time of day on which the cancellation right ends.

The contract shall be accompanied by duplicate completed forms, captioned "notice of cancellation" in at least nine-point bold-faced type if the contract is printed or in capital letters if the contract is typed, followed by a space in which the equity purchaser shall enter the date on which the home owner executed the contract. Such form shall:

Be attached to the contract;

Be easily detachable; and

Contain the following statement, in at least nine-point type if the contract is printed or in capital letters if the contract is typed:

The equity purchaser shall provide the home owner with a copy of the contract and the attached notice of cancellation.

Until the equity purchaser has complied with this section, the home owner may cancel the contract.

You may cancel this contract for the sale of your house without any penalty or obligation at any time before

(Date and time of day). See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right.

NOTICE OF CANCELLATION

(Enter date contract signed). You may cancel this contract for the sale of your house, without any penalty or obligation, at any time before

(Enter date and time of day). To cancel this transaction, personally deliver a signed and dated copy of this Notice of Cancellation in the United States mail, postage prepaid, to

, (Name of purchaser) at

(Street address of purchaser's place of business) NOT LATER THAN

(Enter date and time of day). I hereby cancel this transaction

(Date)

(Seller's signature)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1340, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

IP(2) and IP(2)(c) amended, (HB 10-1133), ch. 350, p. 1617, § 6, effective January 1, 2011.

6-1-1115. Options through reconveyances.

A transaction in which a home owner purports to grant a residence in foreclosure to an equity purchaser by an instrument that appears to be an absolute conveyance and reserves to the home owner or is given by the equity purchaser an option to repurchase shall be permitted only where all of the following conditions have been met:

The reconveyance contract complies in all respects with section 6-1-1112;

The reconveyance contract provides the home owner with a nonwaivable thirty-day right to cure any default of said reconveyance contract and specifies that the home owner may exercise this right to cure on at least three separate occasions during such reconveyance contract;

The equity purchaser fully assumes or discharges the lien in foreclosure as well as any prior liens that will not be extinguished by such foreclosure, which assumption or discharge shall be accomplished without violation of the terms and conditions of the liens being assumed or discharged;

The equity purchaser verifies and can demonstrate that the home owner has or will have a reasonable ability to make the lease payments and to repurchase the residence in foreclosure within the term of the option to repurchase under the reconveyance contract. For purposes of this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that the home owner has a reasonable ability to make lease payments and to repurchase the residence in foreclosure if the home owner's payments for primary housing expenses and regular principal and interest payments on other personal debt do not exceed sixty percent of the home owner's monthly gross income; and

The price the home owner must pay to exercise the option to repurchase the residence in foreclosure is not unconscionable. Without limitation on available claims under section 6-1-1119, a repurchase price exceeding twenty-five percent of the price at which the equity purchaser acquired the residence in foreclosure creates a rebuttable presumption that the reconveyance contract is unconscionable. The acquisition price paid by the equity purchaser may include any actual costs incurred by the equity purchaser in acquiring the residence in foreclosure.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1341, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1116. Waiver of rights - void.

A provision in a contract between an equity purchaser and home owner is void as against public policy if it attempts or purports to:

Waive any of the rights specified in this subpart 3 or the right to a jury trial;

Consent to jurisdiction for litigation or choice of law in a state other than Colorado;

Consent to venue in a county other than the county in which the property is located; or

Impose any costs or fees greater than the actual costs and fees.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1342, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1117. Prohibited conduct.

The contract provisions required by sections 6-1-1111 to 6-1-1114 shall be provided and completed in conformity with such sections by the equity purchaser.

Until the time within which the home owner may cancel the transaction has fully elapsed, the equity purchaser shall not do any of the following:

Accept from a home owner an execution of, or induce a home owner to execute, an instrument of conveyance of any interest in the residence in foreclosure;

Record with the county recorder any document, including, but not limited to, the contract or any lease, lien, or instrument of conveyance, that has been signed by the home owner;

Transfer or encumber or purport to transfer or encumber an interest in the residence in foreclosure to a third party; or

Pay the home owner any consideration.

Within ten days following receipt of a notice of cancellation given in accordance with sections 6-1-1113 and 6-1-1114, the equity purchaser shall return without condition the original contract and any other documents signed by the home owner.

An equity purchaser shall make no untrue or misleading statements of material fact regarding the value of the residence in foreclosure, the amount of proceeds the home owner will receive after a foreclosure sale, any contract term, the home owner's rights or obligations incident to or arising out of the sale transaction, the nature of any document that the equity purchaser induces the home owner to sign, or any other untrue or misleading statement concerning the sale of the residence in foreclosure to the equity purchaser.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1342, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1118. Criminal penalties.

A person who violates section 6-1-1117 (2) or (3) or who intentionally violates section 6-1-1117 (4) is guilty of a misdemeanor, as defined in section 18-1.3-504, C.R.S., and shall be subject to imprisonment in county jail for up to one year, a fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars, or both.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1343, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1119. Unconscionability.

An equity purchaser or associate may not facilitate or engage in any transaction that is unconscionable given the terms and circumstances of the transaction.

If a court, as a matter of law, finds an equity purchaser contract or any clause of such contract to have been unconscionable at the time it was made, the court may refuse to enforce the contract, enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or so limit the application of any unconscionable clause as to avoid an unconscionable result.

When it is claimed or appears to the court that the contract or any clause thereof may be unconscionable, the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose, and effect, to aid the court in making the determination.

In order to support a finding of unconscionability, there must be evidence of some bad faith overreaching on the part of the equity purchaser or associate such as that which results from an unreasonable inequality of bargaining power or under other circumstances in which there is an absence of meaningful choice for one of the parties, together with contract terms that are, under standard industry practices, unreasonably favorable to the equity purchaser or associate.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1343, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1120. Language.

Any contract, rental agreement, lease, option or right to repurchase, and any notice, conveyance, lien, encumbrance, consent, or other document or instrument signed by a home owner, shall be written in English; except that, if the equity purchaser has actual or constructive knowledge that the home owner's principal language is other than English, the home owner shall be provided with a notice, written in the home owner's principal language, substantially as follows:

If a notice in the home owner's principal language is required to be provided under subsection (1) of this section, the notice shall be given to the home owner as a separate document accompanying the written contract required by section 6-1-1111.

This transaction involves important and complex legal consequences, including your right to cancel this transaction within three business days following the date you sign this contract. You should consult with an attorney or seek assistance from a housing counselor by calling the Colorado foreclosure hotline at _________________

[current, correct telephone number].

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1343, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1133), ch. 350, p. 1617, § 7, effective January 1, 2011.

6-1-1121. Short sales - subsequent purchaser - definition.

With respect to any short sale transaction in which an equity purchaser intends to resell the residence in foreclosure to a subsequent purchaser, the equity purchaser shall:

Provide full disclosure to the home owner and to the holders of the evidence of debt on the residence in foreclosure, or such holders' representatives, of the terms of the agreement between the equity purchaser and any subsequent purchaser, including but not limited to the purchase price to be paid by the subsequent purchaser for the residence in foreclosure, which disclosure shall be made within one business day of identifying any such subsequent purchaser and in no event later than closing on the short sale transaction;

Provide full disclosure to any subsequent purchaser and to any subsequent purchaser's lender, or such lender's representative, at the time of contract with the equity purchaser, of the terms of the agreement between the equity purchaser and the home owner, including but not limited to the purchase price paid by the equity purchaser for the residence in foreclosure;

Comply with all applicable rules adopted by the Colorado real estate commission with regard to short sales; and

Comply with section 38-35-125, C.R.S.

As used in this section, a "subsequent purchaser" means any person who enters into a contract with an equity purchaser prior to the disbursement of the short sale transaction to acquire the residence in foreclosure and who acquires the residence in foreclosure within fourteen days after the disbursement of the short sale transaction.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1133), ch. 350, p. 1618, § 8, effective January 1, 2011.